Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 2. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 26.10.060.
Extension of Universal Military Training and Service Act provisions to Alaska employees.

The provisions of 50 U.S.C. App. 459 (sec. 9, Universal Military Training and Service Act), as amended, are extended to this state and its political subdivisions.

In this section, “veteran” means a person

subject to the Universal Military Training and Service Act; or

who served in the Alaska Territorial Guard.

History.

(§ 44-2-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1962; am § 9 ch 93 SLA 1991; am § 39 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Sec. 26.10.065.
Disposition of remains of state resident armed forces personnel on duty status.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, if a state resident who is a member of the armed forces has executed the United States Department of Defense Military Record of Emergency Data Form (DD Form 93), or its successor form, to serve as a record of emergency data and, on that form, has designated a person who is authorized to direct the disposition of the member’s remains if the member dies while in a duty status as described in 10 U.S.C. 1481, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the person authorized to direct the disposition of remains on the executed form has the right to make the decisions concerning the disposition of the member’s remains.

If a state resident who is a member of the United States Coast Guard has executed the United States Coast Guard Designation of Beneficiaries and Record of Emergency Data Form (CG-2020D), or its successor form, to serve as a record of emergency data and, on that form, has designated a person who is authorized to direct the disposition of the member’s remains if the member dies while in a duty status as described in 10 U.S.C. 1481, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the person authorized to direct the disposition of remains on the executed form has the right to make the decisions concerning the disposition of the member’s remains.

History.

(§ 2 ch 1 SLA 2011)

Sec. 26.10.070.
Record of veterans of the armed forces of the United States.

A veteran may record without fee the veteran’s armed forces report of separation at a recorder’s office of the Department of Natural Resources.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 25 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 44-2-2 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 35 SLA 1981; am §§ 1, 2 ch 25 SLA 2001)

Cross references. —

For free copies of public records for veterans, see AS

40.25.121

.

Sec. 26.10.080.
Death gratuity.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs shall pay, upon application, a death gratuity in the amount of $750 to the surviving spouse of a qualified veteran who was a resident of the state at the time of death. If the veteran has no surviving spouse, the gratuity shall be paid to the personal representative of the veteran. A veteran is qualified under this subsection if the veteran’s

burial occurred in the state on or after May 13, 1984; or

death occurred on or after September 19, 1990.

A death gratuity may be paid for a veteran otherwise eligible under (a) of this section even if the veteran died while temporarily absent from the state.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs may not pay a death gratuity unless the veteran for whom payment is made received an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable conditions.

In this section,

“personal representative” includes administrator, executor, special administrator, successor personal representative, and persons who perform substantially the same function under the law governing their status;

“veteran” means

a person who served in a branch of the armed services of the United States

who at the time of entry into the service was a resident of the territory or state, who had been a resident for not less than one year immediately before entry into the service, and who returned to the territory or state within one year after discharge as a resident with the intention of remaining in the territory or state; or

who was a resident of the state for not less than one year immediately preceding the time of death; or

a person who served in the Alaska Territorial Guard, the Alaska Army National Guard, the Alaska Air National Guard, or the Alaska Naval Militia, or who served in a reserve unit of the United States armed forces in Alaska if the reserve unit required a minimum of one weekend of duty each month and 15 consecutive days of active duty training each year for not less than three years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1982; am § 14 ch 67 SLA 1983; am E.O. No. 58, § 12 (1984); am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 146 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In subsection (c) of this section, “Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs” was substituted for “division of veterans’ affairs” under § 27, E.O. 58, in 1984.

Sec. 26.10.085.
Persons providing veterans’ benefits services; disclosure.

A person that provides veterans’ benefits services or veterans’ benefits appeal services to a veteran or a veteran’s dependents, survivors, or personal representative for compensation shall disclose to the veteran or veteran’s dependents, survivors, or personal representative that veterans’ benefits services and veterans’ benefits appeal services are provided at no cost by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs.

The disclosure required under (a) of this section must appear on an agreement to provide veterans’ benefits services or veterans’ benefits appeal services. The veteran or veteran’s dependents, survivors, or personal representative shall acknowledge receipt by signing and dating the disclosure, and the person providing the services shall retain a copy of the signed acknowledgment. The adjutant general of the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs shall develop the disclosure required under (a) of this section and publish the disclosure on the department’s publicly available Internet website.

An advertisement for veterans’ benefits services or veterans’ benefits appeal services must include the disclosure required under (a) of this section, communicated in a clear and conspicuous manner.

A person who violates this section shall forfeit compensation and is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation. Each day of continuing noncompliance constitutes a separate violation. This subsection does not apply to an owner or employee of a medium in which an advertisement appears or through which an advertisement is disseminated.

In this section,

“advertisement” means a commercial message in a communications medium that directly or indirectly promotes the solicitation of business, provides information about veterans’ benefits services or veterans’ benefits appeal services, or promotes a person who offers veterans’ benefits services or veterans’ benefits appeal services;

“veteran” means an individual who

served in the

armed forces of the United States, including a reserve unit of the United States armed forces; or

Alaska Territorial Guard, the Alaska Army National Guard, the Alaska Air National Guard, or the Alaska Naval Militia; and

was separated from service under a condition that was not dishonorable;

“veterans’ benefits” means a present or future gain or advantage to a veteran or a veteran’s dependents, survivors, or personal representative that results from the beneficiary’s veteran status;

“veterans’ benefits appeal services” means services performed to assist a veteran or a veteran’s dependents, survivors, or personal representative in appealing a denial of federal or state veterans’ benefits;

“veterans’ benefits services” means services provided to a veteran or a veteran’s dependents, survivors, or personal representative to assist the veteran or dependent, survivor, or personal representative in obtaining federal or state veterans’ benefits.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 2021)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 31, SLA 2021, which enacted this section, took effect on November 26, 2021.

Sec. 26.10.090.
Alaska Territorial Guard veterans included.

In this chapter, except where otherwise indicated, “veteran” includes a person who served in the Alaska Territorial Guard.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 1991)